Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1454.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The sum of $7,000,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, from the general fund to the criminal justice training commission for the purpose of the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to administer a grant program for multijurisdictional drug task forces. The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall require grant recipients to adhere to the same peer review and reporting requirements that existed for recipients of the Edward Byrne memorial justice assistance grant funds as those requirements existed on January 1, 2023. The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs may retain up to five percent of the amounts provided in this section for administration of the program.--- END ---